Maryland, session 2025, SB0890.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 6–1201 through 6–1203 and the subtitle “Subtitle 12. Just Community
Designation”; and 6–1301 through 6–1307 and the subtitle “Subtitle 13. Community Health
and Safety Works Grant Program” of Article – Housing and Community Development of
the Annotated Code of Maryland be renumbered to be Section(s) 5.5–101 through 5.5–103,
respectively, and the subtitle “Subtitle 1. Just Community Designation”; and 5.5–301
through 5.5–307, respectively, and the subtitle “Subtitle 3. Community Health and Safety
Works Grant Program”.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Housing and Community Development
2–201.
The Department consists of:
(1) the Division of Credit Assurance;
(2) the Division of Development Finance;
(3) the Division of Neighborhood Revitalization;
(4) THE DIVISION OF JUST COMMUNITIES;
(5) the Community Development Administration;
[(5)] (6) the Community Legacy Program;
[(6)] (7) the Housing Finance Review Committee;
[(7)] (8) the Lead Hazard Advisory Committee;

SENATE BILL 890 3
[(8)] (9) the Maryland Housing Fund;
[(9)] (10) the Neighborhood Business Development Program;
[(10)] (11) the Historic Property Revitalization Director; and
[(11)] (12) any other governmental unit that under law is a part of the
Department.
TITLE 5.5. DIVISION OF JUST COMMUNITIES.
Subtitle 1. [Just Community Designation] DIVISION ESTABLISHED.
5.5–101.
(a) In this [subtitle] TITLE the following words have the meanings indicated.
(B) “DIVISION” MEANS THE DIVISION OF JUST COMMUNITIES.
(C) “FORECLOSURE HOT SPOT” MEANS A COMMUNITY THAT:
(1) HAS MORE THAN 10 FORECLOSURE EVENTS IN A GIVEN QUARTER;
AND
(2) RECORDS A FORECLOSURE CONCENTRATION RATIO OF GREATER
THAN 100.
[(b)] (D) “Just Community” means the part of a priority funding area that, as
determined by the [Governor] DEPARTMENT, satisfies the requirements of [§ 6–1203] §
5.5–201 of this [subtitle] TITLE.
[(c)] (E) “Priority funding area” means an area designated as a priority funding
area under § 5–7B–02 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(F) “UNDERSERVED COMMUNITY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 1–107 OF
THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE.
5.5–102.
(a) The General Assembly finds that the State must have Just Communities in
order to:
(1) affirmatively advance equity, civil rights, racial justice, and equal
opportunity in the State;

SENATE BILL 890
(2) create opportunities for the improvement of communities that have
been historically underserved, with anticipated benefits for the entire State; and
(3) right the wrongs of the past, when the State systematically excluded
certain groups from equal participation in the benefits of public resources.
(b) It is the intent of the General Assembly that the DEPARTMENT UTILIZE THE
DIVISION OF JUST COMMUNITIES AND THE Just Community designation [be used to
prioritize State funding to increase racial, economic, and health equity in the State] TO:
(1) IDENTIFY AND PRIORITIZE FUNDING TO ADDRESS CHALLENGES IN
JUST COMMUNITIES THAT INVOLVE:
(I) THE RENTAL HOUSING MARKET;
(II) MORTGAGE LENDING;
(III) HOUSING VALUATION PRACTICES;
(IV) DISPARITIES WITH HOUSING INFRASTRUCTURE;
(V) FORECLOSURES; AND
(VI) INTERGENERATIONAL WEALTH; AND
(2) COORDINATE WITH OTHER STATE PROGRAMS TO MAXIMIZE THE
STATE’S INVESTMENT IN JUST COMMUNITIES.
5.5–103.
(A) THERE IS A DIVISION OF JUST COMMUNITIES IN THE DEPARTMENT.
(B) THE DIVISION SHALL:
(1) IDENTIFY AND SECURE GRANTS AND FUNDING TO ADMINISTER
INITIATIVES AND PROGRAMS FOR JUST COMMUNITIES THAT:
(I) REMEDY HISTORICAL DISINVESTMENT AND EXCLUSIONARY
ZONING POLICIES;
(II) PROMOTE COMMUNITY HEALTH, PUBLIC SAFETY, AND
CAPACITY–BUILDING TRAINING; AND

SENATE BILL 890 5
(III) PROVIDE TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE TO LOCAL PUBLIC
AGENCIES, NONPROFIT ORGANIZATIONS, AND NEIGHBORHOOD OR COMMUNITY
ORGANIZATIONS THAT AIM TO ACHIEVE ANY OF THE PURPOSES SET FORTH IN ITEMS
(I) AND (II) OF THIS ITEM;
(2) ADMINISTER EACH PROGRAM ASSIGNED TO THE DIVISION BY
STATUTE, THE GOVERNOR, OR THE SECRETARY; AND
(3) PERFORM ANY FUNCTION THAT THE SECRETARY ASSIGNS TO IT
TO CARRY OUT THE PROVISIONS OF THIS TITLE.
(C) IN SECURING FUNDING TO ADMINISTER INITIATIVES AND PROGRAMS
FOR JUST COMMUNITIES UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, THE DIVISION
SHALL ENSURE COORDINATION WITH ACTIVITIES FUNDED THROUGH:
(1) THE CONTINUING THE CORE PARTNERSHIP FUND UNDER §
4–511 OF THIS ARTICLE; AND
(2) THE COMMUNITY HEALTH AND SAFETY WORKS GRANT
PROGRAM UNDER SUBTITLE 3 OF THIS TITLE.
SUBTITLE 2. JUST COMMUNITY DESIGNATION.
[5.5–103.] 5.5–201.
[(a)] The [Governor, on the recommendation of the Secretary,] DEPARTMENT may
designate an area as a Just Community if [the Secretary demonstrates that]:
(1) [past and current trends in homeownership, property values,
commercial and residential vacancy, and business or housing investment show a need for
reinvestment in the area; and] THE AREA INCLUDES SEPARATE AND UNEQUAL
NEIGHBORHOODS DISTINGUISHED BY DISPARITIES IN PRIVATE AND PUBLIC
RESOURCE ALLOCATION, INCLUDING FOR:
(I) HOME MORTGAGES;
(II) SMALL BUSINESSES; AND
(III) COMMERCIAL REAL ESTATE;
(2) THE FORECLOSURE RATE FOR THE AREA EXCEEDS THE AVERAGE
FORECLOSURE RATE FOR THE STATE;
(3) THE AREA INCLUDES A FORECLOSURE HOT SPOT;

SENATE BILL 890
[(2)] (4) the area has been negatively impacted by a history of
RESIDENTIAL SEGREGATION DUE TO PAST FEDERAL, STATE, OR LOCAL LAWS,
REGULATIONS, OR POLICIES, INCLUDING:
(i) [forms of legal racial segregation including redlining,
exclusionary zoning, or racially restrictive covenants] REDLINING;
(ii) [the demolition of residential neighborhoods through the use of
eminent domain or State or federal funding;
(iii) a State imprisonment rate higher than 750 per 100,000 persons]
EXCLUSIONARY ZONING; or
(III) RACIALLY RESTRICTIVE COVENANTS;
(5) THE AREA WAS HISTORICALLY CLASSIFIED AS “HAZARDOUS” BY
THE HOME OWNERS’ LOAN CORPORATION;
(6) HOUSING AND BUSINESS INVESTMENTS FOR THE AREA ARE NOT
COMPARABLE TO THE AVERAGE OF OTHER SIMILAR COMMUNITIES IN THE STATE,
AS INDICATED BY FACTORS SUCH AS:
(I) SIGNIFICANTLY LOW HOMEOWNERSHIP RATES;
(II) SIGNIFICANTLY LOW PROPERTY VALUES; OR
(III) SIGNIFICANTLY HIGH RESIDENTIAL AND COMMERCIAL
VACANCY RATES;
(7) THE AREA HAS A HISTORY OF NEIGHBORHOOD DEMOLITION
THROUGH THE USE OF:
(I) EMINENT DOMAIN;
(II) FEDERAL POLICY; OR
(III) STATE POLICY;
(8) THE AREA HAD A STATE IMPRISONMENT OR PAROLE RATE OF 6%
OR MORE OF THE ADULT POPULATION DURING THE MOST RECENT 2–YEAR PERIOD
FOR WHICH DATA IS AVAILABLE;

SENATE BILL 890 7
[(iv)] (9) THE AREA IS SUBJECT TO unequal exposure to
environmental and health hazards, including:
[1. proximity to a federal Superfund site;
2. estimated exposure to lead–based paint; and]
(I) ACCUMULATED MIXED CONTAMINANTS;
(II) AIR POLLUTION;
(III) LAND POLLUTION; OR
(IV) WATER POLLUTION; OR
[3.] (10) rates of asthma among adults IN THE AREA that
are higher than the 90th percentile for the State.
[(b) To maintain a Just Community designation, every 5 years the Secretary shall
make designation recommendations for approval by the Governor in accordance with
subsection (a) of this section.
(c) At the time Just Communities are designated or renewed, the Governor shall
identify State programs under which a Just Community shall receive priority for State
funding.
(d) The prioritization of State funding for Just Communities under subsection (c)
of this section shall not supersede other program requirements specified in State law.]
5.5–301.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Eligible project” means:
(1) a facility and community improvement project as defined in [§ 6–1304]
§ 5.5–304 of this subtitle;
(2) a business district and neighborhood security project as defined in [§
6–1305] § 5.5–305 of this subtitle; or
(3) a community–centered crime and violence intervention and prevention
project as defined in [§ 6–1306] § 5.5–306 of this subtitle.
(c) “Program” means the Community Health and Safety Works Grant Program.

SENATE BILL 890
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.